District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0825.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Alternative Breakfast Service Model Emergency Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 2. The Healthy Schools Act of 2010, effective July 27, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-209;
D.C. Official Code §§ 38-821.01 et seq.) is amended as follows:
(a) Section 101(1B) (D.C. Official Code § 38–821.01) is amended to read as follows:
“(1B) “Breakfast in the classroom” means an alternative breakfast serving model where
students are served breakfast in the classroom.”
(b) Section 203(a) (D.C. Official Code § 38–822.03(a)) is amended as follows:
(1) Subparagraph (2)(A) is amended by striking the phrase “breakfast in the
classroom” and inserting the phrase “all students grab-and-go breakfast, breakfast in the
classroom, or a combination of both breakfast models” in its place.
(2) Subparagraph (2)(C) is amended by striking the phrase “, without breakfast-in-
the-classroom”.


(3) Subparagraph (3)(A) is amended by striking the phrase “breakfast in the
classroom” and inserting the phrase “grab-and-go breakfast, breakfast in the classroom, or a
combination of both breakfast models” in its place.
(4) Subparagraph (3)(B) is amended by striking the phrase “breakfast in the
classroom” and inserting the phrase “grab-and-go breakfast, breakfast in the classroom, or a
combination of both breakfast models” in its place.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).